District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.02

Application for financing order.

(a)

Within 60 days from May 3, 2014, the District shall provide the electric company with estimates of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Annual Revenue Requirements that will enable the District to pay the debt service and other financing costs associated with Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and such other information as may be in the possession of the District as may be necessary or reasonably desirable to submit an application for a financing order. For good cause, the electric company and the District may mutually agree upon a later date of delivery and shall jointly inform the Commission of their agreement.

(b)

Within 30 days of the receipt of the estimates and information required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the electric company shall file for the Commission’s consideration and decision, an application for a financing order with respect to the repayment of Bonds for DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activities to be funded pursuant to this chapter. The financing order application, and all subsequent applications by the electric company for a financing order, shall contain:

(1)

A statement from the District containing a description of the Bond issue or issues, including the principal amount or amounts, expected financing costs, expected interest rate or rates, forecasted average term and retirement schedule, and estimates of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Annual Revenue Requirements that will enable the District to pay the debt service and financing costs associated with Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter;

(2)

A calculation by the electric company of the estimated DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges, the level of the expected charge by distribution service customer class, and the calculated amount estimated to be sufficient to generate an amount at least equal to the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Annual Revenue Requirement as provided by the District;

(3)

A proposed form of the servicing agreement between the District, the electric company, and the Trustee;

(4)

The proposed methodology for allocating DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges among the electric company’s distribution service customer classes subject to that allocation; and

(5)

A proposed form of public notice of the application suitable for publication by the Commission.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 302, 61 DCR 1882